California, session 20252026, AB2417.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 87483.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:87483.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Defined Benefit Program” has the same meaning as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22100) of Part 13 of Division 1 of Title 1.(2)(1) “Cash Balance Benefit Program” has the same meaning as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22100) of Part 13 of Division 1 of Title 1.(3)(2) “Creditable service” has the same meaning as defined, with respect to community colleges, in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22100) of Part 13 of Division 1 of Title 1.(3) “Defined Benefit Program” has the same meaning as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22100) of Part 13 of Division 1 of Title 1.(4) “Social security” means the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).(b) A person classified as a temporary employee pursuant to Section 87482.5 who is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service shall be provided with the option of membership in the Defined Benefit Program, Program aligned with Section 22509, the Cash Balance Benefit Program, Program aligned with Section 26300, if offered, or social security.(c) This section does not limit a community college district from offering an alternative retirement option in addition to those described in subdivision (b).(d)The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall work with(d) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the State Teachers’ Retirement System and the Public Employees’ Retirement System to develop shall develop and post on their internet websites informational materials regarding all of the following:(1)(A) The differences between membership and contributions made to the retirement options described in subdivision (b).(2)(B) Examples covering the amount of time required to vest in benefits offered by the retirement options described in subdivision (b).(3)(C) Examples of the impact of having credits provided in social security.(2) Commencing July 1, 2027, a community college district shall provide the informational materials described in paragraph (1) to a newly hired person who is classified as a temporary employee pursuant to Section 87482.5.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.